Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.16.070

Franchises within territory excluded.

In regard to franchises previously granted for operation of any public service business or facility within the territory excluded from a code city by proceedings under this chapter, the rights, obligations, and duties of the legislative body of the county or other political subdivision having jurisdiction over such territory and of the franchise holder shall be as provided in RCW 35.02.160, relating to inclusion of territory by an incorporation, and such a franchise shall be canceled and a new franchise issued by the legislative body having jurisdiction, as therein provided.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.16.070.]